Utah statutes.
16-17-204.   Listing of commercial registered agent.

(1)  An individual or a domestic or foreign entity may become listed as a commercial registered agent by filing with the division a commercial registered agent listing statement signed by or on behalf of the person which states:

(a)  the name of the individual or the name, type, and jurisdiction of organization of the entity;

(b)  that the person is in the business of serving as a commercial registered agent in this state; and

(c)  the address of a place of business of the person in this state to which service of process and other notice and documents being served on or sent to entities represented by it may be delivered.

(2)  A commercial registered agent listing statement may include the information regarding acceptance of service of process in a record by the commercial registered agent provided for in Subsection 16-17-301(4).

(3)  If the name of a person filing a commercial registered agent listing statement is not distinguishable on the records of the division from the name of another commercial registered agent listed under this section, the person shall adopt a fictitious name that is distinguishable and use that name in its statement and when it does business in this state as a commercial registered agent.

(4)  A commercial registered agent listing statement takes effect on filing.

(5)  The division shall note the filing of the commercial registered agent listing statement in the index of filings maintained by the division for each entity represented by the registered agent at the time of the filing.  The statement has the effect of deleting the address of the registered agent from the registered agent filing of each of those entities.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

